New York, session 2025-2026, S7093.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 502 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 10 to read as follows: 3 10. Required reporting. The commissioner shall promulgate rules and 4 regulations requiring any person issued a license or permit under this 5 article to report the instance of a medically diagnosed seizure experi- 6 enced by such person to the commissioner within sixty days of such 7 seizure. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 10 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 11 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 12 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11335-01-5